Massachusetts, session 194th, H2883.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4(2)(b) of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by changing the third to the last word from the end of the
second sentence from “the” to “any.”
of 1